District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0757.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the "Illegal Occupancy Enforcement Amendment Act of 2026".
Sec. 2. Section 824(a) of An Act To establish a code of law for the District of Columbia,
approved March 3, 1901 (31 Stat. 1324; D.C. Official Code § 22-3302(a)), is amended by adding
a new paragraph (3) to read as follows:
"(3) For the purposes of this subsection, a person who, without lawful permission,
remains in a hotel, motel, or similar establishment that provides lodging to transient guests
beyond the term of the person's rental, reservation, or other contractual agreement, or without
timely making a contractually required payment for the rental or reservation, shall be deemed to
be without lawful authority to remain in the property.".
Sec. 3. Section 107 of the Short-Term Rental Regulation Act of 2018, effective April 25,
2019 (D.C. Law 22-307; D.C. Official Code§ 30-201.07), is amended as follows:

(a) The existing text is designated as subsection (a).
(b) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “short-term rental” and inserting the
phrase “short-term rental, including a vacation rental,” in its place.
(c) A new subsection (b) is added to read as follows:
“(b) A transient guest of a short-term rental, including a vacation rental, shall exit the
premises at the conclusion of their rental and shall have no right to remain on the premises after
the conclusion of their rental unless granted such right by the host.”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 60-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(2) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.22(c)(2)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.


GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL
ATTORNEY GENERAL ATTORNEY-CLIENT COMMUNICATION
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: July 9, 2026
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of the “Illegal Occupancy Enforcement Amendment Act of
2026”
(AE-26-325)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Office of the Attorney General has reviewed the
above-referenced legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this
regard, please do not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W., Suite 409, Washington, D.C. 20004
Phone (202) 262-6402 Email: adele.el-khouri@dc.gov